Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-3342.04
Title IV-D Division; establish Customer Service Unit; duties.

(1) The Title IV-D Division shall establish a Customer Service Unit. In hiring the initial staff for the unit, a hiring preference shall be given to employees of the clerks of the district court. The duties of the Customer Service Unit include, but are not limited to:

(a) Providing account information as well as addressing inquiries made by customers of the State Disbursement Unit; and

(b) Administering two statewide toll-free telephone systems, one for use by employers and one for use by all other customers, to provide responses to inquiries regarding income withholding, the collection and disbursement of support order payments made to the State Disbursement Unit, and other child support enforcement issues, including establishing a call center with sufficient telephone lines, a voice response unit, and adequate personnel available during normal business hours to ensure that responses to inquiries are made by the division's personnel or the division's designee.

(2) The physical location of the Customer Service Unit shall be in Nebraska. Customer service staff responsible for providing account information related to the State Disbursement Unit may be located at the same location as the State Disbursement Unit.

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 169;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 50;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 4.
July 18, 2026